California statutes. Public Resources Code
The board shall not adopt or revise the state policy, unless a public hearing is first held respecting its adoption or revision. At least 30 days prior to the hearing, the board shall give notice of the hearing by publication pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 344.)
-------------------------------------------

2761.

(a) On or before January 1, 1977, and, at a minimum, after the completion of each decennial census, the Office of Planning and Research shall identify portions of the following areas within the state that are urbanized or are subject to urban expansion or other irreversible land uses that would preclude mineral extraction:

(1) Standard metropolitan statistical areas and other areas for which information is readily available.

(2) Other areas as may be requested by the board.

(b) In accordance with a time schedule, and based upon guidelines adopted by the
 board, the State Geologist shall classify, on the basis solely of geologic factors, and without regard to existing land use and land ownership, the areas identified by the Office of Planning and Research, any area for which classification has been requested by a petition that has been accepted by the board, or any other areas as may be specified by the board, as one of the following:

(1) An area that contains mineral deposits and is not of regional or statewide significance.

(2) An area that contains mineral deposits and is of regional or statewide significance.

(3) An area that contains mineral deposits, the significance of which requires further evaluation.

(c) The State Geologist shall require the petitioner to pay the reasonable costs of classifying
 an area for which classification has been requested by the petitioner.

(d) The State Geologist shall transmit the information to the board for incorporation into the state policy and for transmittal to lead agencies.

(e) The board shall transmit mineral resource information on areas classified by the State Geologist pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), or on applicable areas designated by the board pursuant to Section 2790, or both, to a lead agency or a metropolitan planning organization within 30 days of receiving a request for the mineral resource information identified within the jurisdiction of the lead agency or the metropolitan planning organization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 218, Sec. 2.   (AB 566)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2762.

(a) Within 12 months of receiving the mineral information described in Section 2761, and also within 12 months of the designation of an area of statewide or regional significance within its jurisdiction, a lead agency shall, in accordance with state policy, establish mineral resource management policies to be incorporated in its general plan that will:

(1) Recognize mineral information classified by the State Geologist and transmitted by the board.

(2) Assist in the management of land use that affects access to areas of statewide and regional significance.

(3) Emphasize the conservation and development of identified mineral deposits.

(b) A lead agency shall submit proposed mineral resource management policies to the board for review and comment prior to adoption.

(c) A subsequent amendment of the mineral resource management policy previously reviewed by the board shall also require review and comment by the board.

(d) (1) If an area is classified by the State Geologist as an area described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 2761 and the lead agency either has designated that area in its general plan as having important minerals to be protected pursuant to subdivision (a), or otherwise has not yet acted pursuant to subdivision (a), then prior to permitting a use that would threaten the potential to extract minerals in that area, the lead agency shall prepare, in conjunction with preparing, if required, an
 environmental document required by Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000), a statement specifying its reasons for permitting the proposed use, and shall forward a copy to the State Geologist and the board for review.

(2) If the proposed use is subject to the requirements of Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000), the lead agency shall comply with the public review requirements of that division. Otherwise, the lead agency shall provide public notice of the availability of its statement by all of the following:

(A) Publishing the notice at least one time in a newspaper of general circulation in the area affected by the proposed use.

(B) Directly mailing the notice to owners of property within one-half mile of the parcel or parcels on which the proposed use is located as those owners are shown on the latest
 equalized assessment roll.

(3) The public review period shall not be less than 60 days from the date of the notice and shall include at least one public hearing. The lead agency shall evaluate comments received and shall prepare a written response. The written response shall describe the disposition of the major issues raised. In particular, if the lead agency’s position on the proposed use is at variance with recommendations and objections raised in the comments, the written response shall address in detail why specific comments and suggestions were not accepted.

(e) Prior to permitting a use that would threaten the potential to extract minerals in an area classified by the State Geologist as an area described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 2761, the lead agency may cause to be prepared an evaluation of the area in order to ascertain the significance of the
 mineral deposit located in the area. The results of the evaluation shall be transmitted to the State Geologist and the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 162, Sec. 142.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2763.

(a) If an area is designated by the board as an area of regional significance, and the lead agency either has designated that area in its general plan as having important minerals to be protected pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 2762, or otherwise has not yet acted pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 2762, then prior to permitting a use which would threaten the potential to extract minerals in that area, the lead agency shall prepare a statement specifying its reasons for permitting the proposed use, in accordance with the requirements set forth in subdivision (d) of Section 2762. Lead agency land use decisions involving areas designated as being of regional significance shall be in accordance with the lead agency’s mineral resource management policies and shall also, in balancing mineral values against alternative land uses, consider the importance of these minerals to their market region as a whole and not just their importance to the lead agency’s area of jurisdiction.

(b) If an area is designated by the board as an area of statewide significance, and the lead agency either has designated that area in its general plan as having important minerals to be protected pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 2762, or otherwise has not yet acted pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 2762, then prior to permitting a use which would threaten the potential to extract minerals in that area, the lead agency shall prepare a statement specifying its reasons for permitting the proposed use, in accordance with the requirements set forth in subdivision (d) of Section 2762. Lead agency land use decisions involving areas designated as being of statewide significance shall be in accordance with the lead agency’s mineral resource management policies and shall also, in balancing mineral values against alternative land uses, consider the importance of the mineral resources to the state and nation as a whole.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1097, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

2764.

(a) Upon the request of an operator or other interested person and payment by the requesting person of the estimated cost of processing the request, the lead agency having jurisdiction shall amend its general plan, or prepare a new specific plan or amend any applicable specific plan, that shall, with respect to the continuation of the existing surface mining operation for which the request is made, plan for future land uses in the vicinity of, and access routes serving, the surface mining operation in light of the importance of the minerals to their market region as a whole, and not just their importance to the lead agency’s area of jurisdiction.

(b) In adopting amendments to the general plan, or adopting or amending a specific plan, the lead agency shall make written legislative findings as to whether the future land uses and particular access routes will be compatible or incompatible with the continuation of the surface mining operation, and if they are found to be incompatible, the findings shall include a statement of the reasons why they are to be provided for, notwithstanding the importance of the minerals to their market region as a whole or their previous designation by the board, as the case may be.

(c) Any evaluation of a mineral deposit prepared by a lead agency for the purpose of carrying out this section shall be transmitted to the State Geologist and the board.

(d) The procedure provided for in this section shall not be undertaken in any area that has been designated pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 2790) if mineral resource management policies have been established and incorporated in the lead agency’s general plan in conformance with Article 4 (commencing with Section 2755).

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 82, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Reclamation Plans and the Conduct of Surface Mining Operations [2770. - 2779.]

2770.

(a) Except as provided in this section, a person shall not conduct surface mining operations unless a permit is obtained from, a reclamation plan has been submitted to and approved by, and financial assurances for reclamation have been approved by the lead agency for the operation pursuant to this article.

(b) A person with an existing surface mining operation who has vested rights pursuant to Section 2776 and who does not have an approved reclamation plan shall submit a reclamation plan to the lead agency not later than March 31, 1988. If a reclamation plan application is not on file by March 31, 1988, the continuation of the surface mining operation is prohibited until a reclamation plan is
 submitted to the lead agency. For the purposes of this subdivision, a reclamation plan existing prior to January 1, 2017, may consist of all or the appropriate sections of any plans or written agreements previously approved by the lead agency or another agency, together with any additional documents needed to substantially meet the requirements of Sections 2772 and 2773 and the lead agency surface mining ordinance adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 2774, provided that all documents, which together were proposed to serve as the reclamation plan, are submitted for approval to the lead agency in accordance with this chapter.

(c) [Reserved]

(d) [Reserved]

(e) (1) A person who can
 substantiate, based on the evidence of the record, that a lead agency has either (A) failed to act according to due process or has relied on considerations not related to the specific applicable requirements of Sections 2772, 2772.1, 2773, 2773.1, 2773.3, and 2773.4 and the lead agency surface mining ordinance adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 2774 in reaching a decision to deny approval of a reclamation plan or financial assurances for reclamation, or (B) failed to act within a reasonable time of receipt of a completed application may appeal that action or inaction to the board.

(2) The supervisor may appeal a lead agency’s approval of a financial assurance cost estimate to the board if the supervisor has commented pursuant to Section 2773.4 that the financial assurance cost estimate is inadequate based on consideration of the
 following:

(A) Section 2773.1.

(B) Article 11 (commencing with Section 3800) of Subchapter 1 of Chapter 8 of Division 2 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.

(C) The board’s financial assurance guidelines adopted pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 2773.1.

(3) If the approved financial assurance cost estimate applies to a reclamation plan approved for a new surface mining operation, an expanded surface mining operation, or an interim financial assurance cost estimate due to an order to comply, stipulated or otherwise, the operator shall provide a financial assurance mechanism pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 2773.4 in the amount
 of the approved financial assurance cost estimate, notwithstanding an appeal filed pursuant to this subdivision and subject to modification pending the outcome of the appeal.

(4) If the approved financial assurance cost estimate is an update to an existing approved financial assurance cost estimate, the existing financial assurance mechanism shall remain in place and shall not be adjusted until a final determination by the board on the appeal filed pursuant to this subdivision.

(f) (1) The board may decline to hear an appeal if it determines that the appeal raises no substantial issues related to the lead agency’s decision to deny the approval of a reclamation plan or financial assurance, or the timeliness in reviewing a completed application. Appeals filed by
 the supervisor shall be heard by the board.

(2) If the board takes up an appeal, the appeal shall be scheduled and heard at a public hearing within 45 days of the board’s receipt of a complete administrative record, or a longer period as may be mutually agreed to by the board, the appellant, and the operator, or, if the appeal is filed by the supervisor, by the board, the supervisor, and the operator.

(g) (1) (A) When hearing an appeal filed pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (e), the board shall determine whether the reclamation plan or the financial assurance cost estimate substantially meets the applicable requirements of Sections 2772, 2772.1, 2773, 2773.1, 2773.3, and 2773.4; Article 1 (commencing with Section 3500),
 Article 9 (commencing with Section 3700), and Article 11 (commencing with Section 3800) of Subchapter 1 of Chapter 8 of Division 2 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations; and the lead agency’s surface mining ordinance adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 2774. The board shall approve or uphold a reclamation plan or financial assurance cost estimate determined to meet those applicable requirements. In any event, financial assurances for reclamation shall be sufficient to perform reclamation of lands remaining disturbed.

(B) For purposes of this subdivision, “substantially” means actual compliance in respect to the substance and form requirements essential to the objectives of this chapter.

(2) (A) A reclamation plan determined not to meet the applicable
 requirements of Sections 2772, 2772.1, 2773, 2773.1, 2773.3, and 2773.4; Article 1 (commencing with Section 3500), Article 9 (commencing with Section 3700), and Article 11 (commencing with Section 3800) of Subchapter 1 of Chapter 8 of Division 2 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations; and the lead agency’s surface mining ordinance adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 2774 shall be returned to the operator with a notice of deficiencies. The operator shall be granted, once only, a period of 30 days or a longer period mutually agreed upon by the operator and the board to do both of the following:

(i) Correct the noted deficiencies.

(ii) Submit the revised reclamation plan to the lead agency for review and approval.

(B) Within 10 days of the hearing, the board shall provide notice via certified mail to the lead agency, the operator, and the Division of Mine Reclamation of the board’s determination. The notice shall include instructions to the operator to submit to the lead agency for approval a revised reclamation plan consistent with the board’s determination.

(3) (A) If the board determines the lead agency’s approved financial assurance cost estimate does not meet the requirements of Sections 2773.1 and 2773.4, Article 11 (commencing with Section 3800) of Subchapter 1 of Chapter 8 of Division 2 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, and the board’s financial assurance guidelines adopted pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 2773.1, the board shall note the deficiencies and, based on the record, include adequate
 cost estimates for each noted deficiency.

(B) Within 10 days of the hearing, the board shall provide notice via certified mail to the lead agency, the operator, and the Division of Mine Reclamation of the board’s determination with instructions to the operator to submit to the lead agency for approval a revised financial assurance cost estimate consistent with the board’s determination. The instructions shall include a reasonable submission deadline of not less than 30 days.

(C) The lead agency shall approve the revised financial assurance cost estimate. That approval shall supersede and void the prior approved financial assurance cost estimate.

(D) A financial assurance mechanism shall be established by the operator
 pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 2773.4 following the approval of the financial assurance cost estimate.

(E) The failure of the operator to submit to the lead agency a revised financial assurance cost estimate consistent with the board’s determination and deadline may be grounds for the issuance of an order to comply pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 2774.1.

(h) (1) Within 90 days of a surface mining operation becoming idle, as defined in Section 2727.1, the operator shall submit an interim management plan to the lead agency for review. The review and approval of an interim management plan shall not be considered a project for purposes of the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)). The approved interim
 management plan shall be considered an amendment to the surface mining operation’s approved reclamation plan for purposes of this chapter. The interim management plan shall only provide for necessary measures the operator will implement during its idle status to maintain the site in compliance with this chapter, including, but not limited to, all permit conditions.

(2) The interim management plan may remain in effect for a period not to exceed five years, at which time the lead agency shall do one of the following:

(A) Renew the interim management plan for an additional period not to exceed five years, which may be renewed for one additional five-year renewal period at the expiration of the first five-year renewal period, if the lead agency finds that the surface mining operator
 has complied fully with the interim management plan.

(B) Require the operator to commence reclamation in accordance with its approved reclamation plan.

(3) The financial assurances required by Section 2773.1 shall remain in effect during the period that the surface mining operation is idle. If the surface mining operation is still idle after the expiration of its interim management plan, the operator shall commence reclamation in accordance with its approved reclamation plan.

(4) (A) Within 45 days of the receipt of the interim management plan, the lead agency shall review the interim management plan in accordance with its ordinance adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 2774, and if the
 interim management plan satisfies the requirements of this section, forward the plan to the supervisor for comment. Otherwise, the lead agency shall notify the operator in writing of any deficiencies in the interim management plan. The operator shall have 30 days, or a longer period mutually agreed upon by the operator and the lead agency, to submit a revised interim management plan.

(B) The lead agency shall submit the interim management plan, including a revised interim management plan, to the supervisor for review and certify to the supervisor that the interim management plan is a complete submission and complies with all of the following requirements:

(i) The applicable requirements of this chapter.

(ii) Article 1 (commencing with Section 3500) and Article 9 (commencing with Section 3700) of Subchapter 1 of Chapter 8 of Division 2 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, as applicable.

(iii) The lead agency’s surface mining ordinance in effect at the time that the interim management plan is submitted to the
 supervisor for review, except if the board is the lead agency.

(C) After receipt of the certified complete interim management plan, the supervisor shall have 30 days to prepare written comments on the interim management plan, if he or she elects to do so.

(D) The lead agency shall review and evaluate written comments received from the supervisor relating to the interim management plan within a reasonable amount of time.

(E) The lead agency shall prepare a written response to the supervisor’s comments received pursuant to subparagraph (C) describing the disposition of the major issues raised by the comments. The lead agency shall submit its response to the supervisor and the operator at least 30 days prior to the
 intended approval of the interim management plan. The lead agency’s response shall include either of the following:

(i) A description of how the lead agency proposes to adopt the supervisor’s comments to the interim management plan.

(ii) A detailed description of the reasons why the lead agency proposes not to adopt the supervisor’s comments.

(F) Where the supervisor has commented, the lead agency shall give the supervisor at least 30 days’ written notice of the time, place, and date of the hearing at which the interim management plan is scheduled to be approved by the lead agency, or, if no hearing is required by this chapter, the local ordinance, or other law, the lead agency shall provide 30 days’ written notice to the supervisor
 that the lead agency intends to approve the interim management plan.

(G) Within 30 days following the approval of the interim
 management plan, the lead agency shall provide the supervisor notice of the approval and a copy of the approved interim management plan.

(5) The lead agency shall approve or deny approval of the interim management plan within 60 days of receipt of the supervisor’s comments or within 90 days of submitting the interim management plan to the supervisor if no comments are received from the supervisor. If the lead agency denies approval of the interim management plan, the operator may appeal that action to the lead agency’s governing body, which shall schedule a public hearing within 45 days of the filing of the appeal or a longer period mutually agreed upon by the operator and the governing body.

(6) Unless review of an interim management plan is pending before
 the lead agency or an appeal is pending before the lead agency’s governing body, a surface mining operation that remains idle for over one year after becoming idle, as defined in Section 2727.1, without obtaining approval of an interim management plan shall be considered abandoned and the operator shall commence and complete reclamation in accordance with the approved reclamation plan.

(i) An enforcement action that may be brought against a surface mining operation for operating without an approved reclamation plan, financial assurance, or interim management plan shall be held in abeyance pending review pursuant to subdivision (b) or (h), or the resolution of an appeal filed with the board pursuant to subdivision (e), or with a lead agency governing body pursuant to subdivision (h).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 349, Sec. 2.   (AB 3257)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2770.1.

For the purposes of a borrow pit surface mining operation that is owned or operated by a lead agency solely for use by that lead agency, all of the following shall apply:

(a) (1) In addition to the requirements of Sections 2772 and 2773, the lead agency shall include in its reclamation plan maintenance measures that become effective when the borrow pit surface mining operation is idle. The maintenance measures shall maintain the site in compliance with this chapter while the borrow pit surface mining operation is idle.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a lead agency may obtain an interim management plan pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 2770. 

(3) A lead agency that complies with this subdivision shall be exempt from the requirements of paragraph (6) of subdivision (h) of Section 2770.

(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 2770, an interim management plan for a borrow pit surface mining operation may remain in effect until reclamation of the borrow pit surface mining operation is completed in accordance with the approved reclamation plan.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 2774, a lead agency may conduct an inspection of a borrow pit surface mining operation once every two calendar years during a period when the borrow pit surface mining operation is idle.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 8, Sec. 5.   (SB 209)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2770.5.

Whenever surface mining operations are proposed in the 100-year flood plain for any stream, as shown in Zone A of Flood Insurance Rate Maps issued by the Federal Emergency Management Agency, and within one mile, upstream or downstream, of any state highway bridge, the lead agency receiving the application for the issuance or renewal of a permit to conduct the surface mining operations shall notify the Department of Transportation that the application has been received. The Department of Transportation shall have a period of not more than 45 days to review and comment on the proposed surface mining operations with respect to any potential damage to the state highway bridge from the proposed surface mining operations. The lead agency shall not issue or renew the permit until the Department of Transportation has submitted its comments or until 45 days from the date the application for the permit was submitted, whichever occurs first.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 254, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

2770.6.

(a) Whenever surface mining operations are proposed within the boundaries of the San Gabriel Basin Water Quality Authority that may penetrate the groundwater, and whenever proposed reclamation activities may impact groundwater quality, the lead agency reviewing an application to conduct surface mining operations, or reviewing an application for the approval of a reclamation plan, shall notify and provide copies of the subject application to the appropriate California regional water quality control board, and any watermaster for the groundwater recharge basin. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the appropriate California regional water quality control board may impose an administrative fee on the applicant to cover its costs associated with the review of, and preparation of, comments on the subject application, as required pursuant to this section.

(b) Each agency shall have 60 days to review and comment on the proposed surface mining operation described in subdivision (a) and the adoption of any reclamation plan therefor. Each agency shall comment on the existing groundwater quality and the potential impacts to water quality that may result from the mining operations and the proposed reclamation plan, and shall recommend methods and procedures to protect groundwater quality and prevent groundwater degradation. Each agency shall also comment on the proposed mining activities, including the conduct of excavation and backfilling operations in contact with groundwater, and the impact of any proposed alternative land uses on groundwater quality. When the proposed surface mining operations or reclamation plan will impact the groundwater, the lead agency shall not approve the reclamation plan without requiring actions to ensure the reasonable protection of the beneficial uses of groundwater and the prevention of nuisance. Each agency shall have 60 days to review and comment or until 60 days from the date of application, whichever occurs first.

(c) This section applies to activities otherwise subject to this chapter conducted within the boundaries of the San Gabriel Basin Water Quality Authority. To the extent of any conflict between this section and any other provision of this chapter, this section shall prevail.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 515, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

2771.

Whenever a proposed or existing surface mining operation is within the jurisdiction of two or more public agencies, is a permitted use within the agencies, and is not separated by a natural or manmade barrier coinciding with the boundary of the agencies, the evaluation of the proposed or existing operation shall be made by the lead agency in accordance with the procedures adopted by the lead agency pursuant to Section 2774. If a question arises as to which public agency is the lead agency, any affected public agency, or the affected operator, may submit the matter to the board. The board shall notify in writing all affected public agencies and operators that the matter has been submitted, specifying a date for a public hearing. The board shall designate the public agency which shall serve as the lead agency, giving due consideration to the capability of the agency to fulfill adequately the requirements of this chapter and to an examination of which of the public agencies has principal permit responsibility.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1097, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

2772.

(a) The reclamation plan shall be filed with the lead agency, on a form provided by the lead agency, by any person who owns, leases, or otherwise controls or operates on all or any portion of any mined lands and who plans to conduct surface mining operations on the lands.

(b) The reclamation plan shall include a chart identifying the page number, chapter, appendix, or other specific location in the reclamation plan where content meeting the requirements, as applicable, of Sections 2772, 2773, and 2773.3 and Article 1 (commencing with Section 3500) and Article 9 (commencing with Section 3700) of Subchapter 1 of Chapter 8 of Division 2 of Title 14 of the California Code of
 Regulations, is located.

(c) The reclamation plan shall include all of the following information and documents:

(1) The name and address of the operator and the names and addresses of any persons designated by the operator as an agent for the service of process.

(2) The anticipated quantity and type of minerals for which the surface mining operation is to be conducted.

(3) The proposed dates for the initiation and termination of the surface mining operation.

(4) The maximum anticipated depth of the surface mining operation.

(5) A
 reclamation plan map or maps that shall include all of the following:

(A) Size and legal description of the lands that will be affected by the surface mining operation and the names and addresses of the owners of all surface interests and mineral interests in the lands.

(B) Clearly defined and accurately drawn property lines, setbacks, and the reclamation plan boundary.

(C) Existing topography and final topography depicted with contour lines drawn at appropriate intervals for the site’s conditions.

(D) Detailed geologic description of the area of the surface mining operation.

(E) Location of
 railroads, utility facilities, access roads, temporary roads to be reclaimed, and any roads remaining for the approved end use.

(F) All maps, diagrams, or calculations that require preparation in accordance with the Professional Engineers Act (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 6700) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code), the Geologist and Geophysicist Act (Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 7800) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code), or the Professional Land Surveyors’ Act (Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 8700) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code) shall be prepared by a California-licensed professional, shall include his or her license number and name, and shall bear the signature and seal of the licensee.

(6) A
 description of and a plan for the type of surface mining to be employed and a time schedule that will provide for the completion of surface mining on each segment of the mined lands so that reclamation can be initiated at the earliest possible time on those portions of the mined lands that will not be subject to further disturbance by the surface mining operation.

(7) A description of the proposed use or potential uses of the mined lands after reclamation and evidence that all owners of a possessory interest in the land have been notified of the proposed use or potential uses.

(8) A description of the manner in which reclamation, adequate for the proposed use or potential uses, will be accomplished, including both of the following:

(A) A description of the manner in which known contaminants will be controlled and mining waste will be disposed.

(B) A description of the manner in which affected streambed channels and streambanks will be rehabilitated to a condition that minimizes erosion and sedimentation.

(9) An assessment of the effect of implementation of the reclamation plan on future mining in the area.

(10) A statement that the person submitting the reclamation plan accepts responsibility for reclaiming the mined lands in accordance with the reclamation plan.

(11) Any other information that the lead agency may require by ordinance.

(d) An item of information or a document required pursuant to subdivision (c) that has already been prepared as part of a permit application for the surface mining operation or as part of an environmental document prepared for the project pursuant to the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)) may be included in the reclamation plan by reference, if that item of information or that document is attached to the reclamation plan when the lead agency submits the reclamation plan to the supervisor for review. To the extent the information, document, or component of a document referenced in the reclamation plan is used to meet the requirements of subdivision (c) or Section 2773 or 2773.3, the information, document, or component of a document shall become part of the reclamation plan and shall be subject to all other requirements of this article.

(e) Nothing in this section is intended to limit or expand the Division of Mine Reclamation’s authority or responsibility to review a document in accordance with the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 521, Sec. 35.   (SB 809)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2772.1.

(a) (1) Prior to approving a surface mining operation’s reclamation plan or plan amendment, the lead agency shall submit the reclamation plan or plan amendment to the supervisor for review. The reclamation plan or plan amendment shall be submitted to the supervisor as early as practicable in order to facilitate the lead agency’s review of the reclamation plan pursuant to the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)). All documentation for the submission shall be submitted to the supervisor at one time.

(2) An item of information, document, or component of a document that has been prepared as part of a permit application for
 the surface mining operation or as part of an environmental document prepared for the project pursuant to the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)) shall be incorporated into the reclamation plan or plan amendment if it is used to satisfy the requirements of subdivision (c) of Section 2772, Sections 2773 and 2773.3, and Article 1 (commencing with Section 3500) and Article 9 (commencing with Section 3700) of Subchapter 1 of Chapter 8 of Division 2 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, as applicable. If an item of information, document, or component of a document is incorporated, reference to the item shall be added to the chart required pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 2772 and shall be properly indexed with the corresponding appendix reference and page numbers, if applicable. The item shall be included in an appendix to and shall become
 part of the reclamation plan or plan amendment.

(3) The lead agency shall certify to the supervisor that the reclamation plan or plan amendment is a complete submission and is in compliance with all of the following:

(A) The applicable requirements of this chapter.

(B) Article 1 (commencing with Section 3500) and Article 9 (commencing with Section 3700) of Subchapter 1 of Chapter 8 of Division 2 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, as applicable.

(C) The lead agency’s surface mining ordinance in effect at the time that the reclamation plan or plan amendment is submitted to the supervisor for review, except if the board is the lead agency.

(b) (1) The supervisor shall have 30 days from the receipt of a reclamation plan or plan amendment to notify the lead agency and operator if the submission is incomplete. An incomplete submission is one that does not meet the content requirements of Sections 2772, 2773, and 2773.3 and Article 1 (commencing with Section 3500) and Article 9 (commencing with Section 3700) of Subchapter 1 of Chapter 8 of Division 2 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, as applicable. The supervisor’s notice shall specifically identify all aspects of the submission that are incomplete.

(2) The supervisor shall have 30 days after the date the supervisor is required to notify the lead agency if the submission is incomplete to prepare written comments on the
 reclamation plan or plan amendment if the supervisor chooses.

(3) If the supervisor has issued a notice of incomplete submission pursuant to paragraph (1), the supervisor’s time to prepare written comments on the reclamation plan or plan amendment shall not commence until the supervisor receives each item identified in the notice. The supervisor’s time shall include any remaining time pursuant to paragraph (1) and the time allowed pursuant to paragraph (2).

(4) The lead agency shall review and evaluate written comments received from the supervisor relating to the reclamation plan or plan amendment within a reasonable amount of time.

(5) (A) The lead agency shall prepare a written response to the
 supervisor’s comments received pursuant to paragraph (2) describing the disposition of the major issues raised by the comments. The lead agency shall submit its response to the supervisor at least 30 days prior to the intended approval of the reclamation plan or plan amendment. The lead agency’s response shall include either of the following:

(i) A description of how the lead agency proposes to adopt the supervisor’s comments to the reclamation plan or plan amendment.

(ii) A detailed description of the reasons why the lead agency proposes not to adopt the supervisor’s comments.

(B) Copies of any written comments received and responses prepared by the lead agency pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be
 forwarded to the operator.
